Utah statutes.
7-1-601.   Adverse claim to account in depository institution -- Notice required -- Bond may be required for payment.

Receipt of a notice of an adverse claim to a deposit or other account standing on the books of any depository institution doing business in this state does not obligate the depository institution to the adverse claimant, unless the notice is given pursuant to an appropriate court order, obtained by the adverse claimant in a legal action instituted by him in which the person to whose credit the deposit stands is made a party. Such depository institution may also pay the adverse claim, if the claimant executes to the depository institution a good and sufficient bond in double the amount claimed, indemnifying it from any and all liability, loss, damage, costs and expenses including attorneys' fees for and on account of the payment of the adverse claim or the dishonor of a check or other instrument of the person to whose credit the deposit stands on its books.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

